src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON NUORA !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_KIELA, attr. nuora
+A+Attr:  K ; 
+A: X_KIELA	  ;
+A:b^WG COMPe ;
+A:p P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
+A:^WG%> MUS ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Cmp/Attr: ATTR_R ; 
+A+Cmp/SgNom:^RVSH%> R ;
+A+Cmp/SgNom:  RHyph ;
+A+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> R ;
+A+Cmp/PlGen:^WG%>i R ;


!LEXICON KIEVRA !!≈ __@CODE@__ directing to X_KIELA, attr. kievrâs
!+A+Attr:s  K ; 
!+A: X_KIELA	  ;
!+A:b^WG COMPe ;
!+A:p P-COMP-ERR-ORTH ;
!+A:^WG%> MUS ;
!!+A+Err/Orth:s^WG%>u MOS ;
!+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
!+A+Cmp/Attr:s ATTR_R ; 



!! ## Odd-syllable stems
! ------------------

LEXICON NJUORAS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_RUONAS, attr. njuorâs
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH K ; !njuorâs
+A: X_RUONAS ;
+A:^CSH%>u COMPo ; 
+A:^CSH%>u MOS ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A:^CSH A_ADV ; !ruávásávt kiärásávt
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^RVSH%> ATTR_R ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:^CSH^RVSH A_ADV ;
!+A:^CSH^RVSH A_ADV ; !timásávt 
!+A:^WG%> A_LASJ ; !  


LEXICON UAMIS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_RUONAS, as an own group because of FCD, attr. uámi, čuámi, often used in compounds
+A+Attr:^FCD^CSH K ; ! uámi, čuámi
+A: X_RUONAS ;
+A:^CSH%>u COMPo ; 
+A:^CSH%>u MOS ;
+A:^FCD^CSH%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^FCD^CSH%> ATTR_R ;



LEXICON HAANIS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_PAAVIR, attr. hänis
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH K ; ! hänis
+A: X_PAAVIR	  ;
+A+Err/Orth:%>u COMPo ;  ! puárrásub
+A:^CSH%>u COMPo ;  ! hánásuboh corpus: uáppásub
+A:^CSH%>u MOS ; ! hánásumoseh; corpus: uáppásumos uáppásumoseh uáppásumosáid
+A:^WG^RVSH%> A_VUOTA ; 
+A:^CSH^RVSH A_ADV ; !hánásávt 
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^RVSH%> ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RVSH%> R ; !
+A+Cmp/SgGen:^SLEN%> R ; !
+A+Cmp/PlGen:^CSH%>ij R ; !puárásijpargo


LEXICON TIMES !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_PAAVIR, attr. timmâ
+A+Attr:^FCDâ K ; 	! timmâ
+A: X_PAAVIR	  ;
+A:^CSH%>u COMPo ;  ! timásuboh 
+A:^CSH%>u MOS ; ! timásumoseh
+A+Attr:^FCDâ%> R ;
+A:^CSH^RVSH%> A_VUOTA ; 
+A:^CSH^RVSH A_ADV ; !timásávt 


LEXICON KIARGUS_nocomp !!≈ **@CODE@**  like HAANIS, directing to X_PAAVIR, 
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH K ; ! 
+A: X_PAAVIR	  ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^RVSH%> ATTR_R ;
+A:^WG^RVSH%> A_VUOTA ;


LEXICON HAAITIS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_VEESKIR, attr. rähis, not in use
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH  K ; !rähis
+A: X_VEESKIR	  ;
+A:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u MOS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^RVSH%> ATTR_R ;
+A:^WG^RVSH A_VUOTA ;

LEXICON HEEITUG !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_PAAVIR, attr. heitugis, heitugâs
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH%>is  K ; !heitugis
+A+Attr+Err/Orth:^WG^RVSH%>âs  K ; !heitugâs
+A: X_PAAVIR	  ;
+A:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u MOS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^RVSH%>is ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/Attr+Err/Orth:^WG^RVSH%>âs ATTR_R ;
+A: A_ADV ;
+A:^WG A_VUOTA ;


LEXICON VAANIS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to  X_PAAVIR, attr. väni
+A+Attr:väni K ; ! 
+A+Attr+Err/Orth:vanâ K ; ! 
+A:váánnás^ÁI X_PAAVIR	  ;
+A:váánnás^ÁI^CSH%>u COMPo ; 
+A:váánnás^ÁI^CSH%>u MOS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:väni%> ATTR_R ;
+A:vánás A_ADV ;	! vánásávt
+A+Der3+Der/vuota:väni#vuot^RCâ FLAG_2KIELA ;
!+A:^FCD^CSH^RVSH%> A_VUOTA ; ! vänivuotâ; is also lexicalized

LEXICON NJAALGIS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to NJAALGIS_COMMON, Attr. njaalgâ and njälgis
+A+Attr:njaalgâ K ;
+A+Attr:njaalgâ ATTR_R ;
+A+Attr+Use/NG:njälgis K ; ! njälgis
:njá^RVlgás^ÁI NJAALGIS_COMMON ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:njálgá%>ht K ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:njälgis ATTR_R ;

LEXICON RAAPIS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to NJAALGIS_COMMON, Attr. räpis 
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH K ; ! räpis
NJAALGIS_COMMON ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^RVSH%> ATTR_R ;

LEXICON NJAALGIS_COMMON !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to  X_KAARBIS
+A: X_KAARBIS ;
+A:%>u COMPo ; !njálgásub njá^RVlgás^ÁI
+A:%>u MOS ; ! njálgásumos; with Err/Orth njálgâsumos, even njálgsumos
+A:^WG^RVSH%> A_VUOTA ; !njälgisvuođâ

LEXICON KOSKES !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to  X_VEESKIR, attr. koške
+A+Attr:^FCD^WG K ;     !attr. koške
+A: X_VEESKIR ;
+A:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u MOS ;
+A:^WG%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Der4+Der/AAdv+Adv:%>ávt K ;	! koškásávt
+A+Cmp/Attr:^FCD^WG%> ATTR_R ;


LEXICON NJOLGES !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to  X_VEESKIR, attr. njolges
+A+Attr:^WG K ;     !attr. njolges
+A: X_VEESKIR ;
+A:^WG%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u MOS ;
+A:^WG%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG%> ATTR_R ;
+A:^WG%> A_LASJ ; !  



LEXICON FIIJNES !!≈ **@CODE@**  no noun cont.lex with this pattern
+A+Attr:fiijnâ K ;     !attr. fiijnâ
+A+Attr+Use/NG:fijnâ K ;     !attr. fijnâ
+A+Cmp/Attr:fiijnâ ATTR_R ;
+A+Sg+Nom:fiijnes K ;	! fiijnes
+A+Sg+Gen:fijnás K ;     			! fijnás
+A+Sg+Acc:fijnás K ;    			 ! fijnás
+A+Sg+Ill:fijnesân K ; 	! fijnesân
+A+Sg+Loc:fijnesist K ; ! fijnesist
+A+Sg+Com:fijnásáin K ; ! fijnásáin 
+A+Sg+Abe:fijnásttáá K ; !  
+A+Ess:fijnesin K ;   ! fijnesin 
+A+Par:fijnesid K ;	!  
+A+Pl+Nom:fijnáseh K ;  !  
+A+Pl+Gen:fijnásij K ;  !  
+A+Pl+Acc:fijnásijd K ; !  
+A+Pl+Ill:fijnásáid K ; !  
+A+Pl+Loc:fijnásijn K ; !  
+A+Pl+Com:fijnásij GUIN ;  !  
+A+Pl+Abe:fijnásijttáá K ;  !  
+A:fijnásu COMPo ; !fijnásub fijnásubboid
+A:fijnásu MOS ; !fijnásumos
+A:fijnes%> A_VUOTA ; !fijnesvuođáid
+A:fijnás A_ADV ; !fijnásávt, fijnâsávt



LEXICON KOOIDAS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to  X_VEESKIR, attr. koidâ
+A+Attr:^FCD^RVSH K ;     !attr. koidâ
+A: X_VEESKIR ;
+A:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u MOS ;
+A:^WG%> A_VUOTA ;
+A: A_ADV ; !čuhâlávt
+A+Cmp/Attr:^FCD^RVSH%> ATTR_R ;    
+A:^FCD^RVSH%> A_LASJ ; !  


LEXICON SUOTAS  !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to  X_VEESKIR, attr. suotâs
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH  K ; ! suotâs, vädis 
+A: X_VEESKIR ;
+A:u COMPo ; ! suottâsub
+A:%>u MOS ; !suottâsumos
+A:^WG%> A_VUOTA ;
+A: A_ADV ; !suottâsávt
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^RVSH%>  ATTR_R ; ! suotâs, vädis 
+A:^WG%> A_LASJ ; ! rähislâš oleslâš
+A+Attr+Err/Orth:^WG^RVSH%>  A_VUOTA ; ! corp: vijđesvuođâ 


LEXICON LIAGUS  !!≈ **@CODE@** like SUOTAS except for CSH
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH  K ; ! suotâs, vädis
+A+Sg+Nom:^WG^RVSH K ; !peles
+A+Sg+Gen: K ;   !
+A+Sg+Acc: K ;      
+A+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>ân K ; 
+A+Sg+Loc:^CSH%>ist K ;
+A+Sg+Com:^CSH%>áin K ;
+A+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;  
+A+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>in K ; 
+A+Par:^WG^RVSH%>id K ; 
+A+Pl+Nom:^CSH%>eh K ;  
+A+Pl+Gen:^CSH%>ij K ;  
+A+Pl+Acc:^CSH%>ijd K ; 
+A+Pl+Loc:^CSH%>ijn K ; 
+A+Pl+Com:^CSH%>ij GUIN ; 
+A+Pl+Abe:^CSH%>ijttáá K ; 
+A+Pl+Ill:^CSH%>áid K ; 
+A:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u COMPo ; ! liäggusub
+A+Err/Orth:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u MOS ; !liäggusumos
+A+Err/Orth:%>u MOS ; 
+A:^WG^RVSH%> A_VUOTA ;
+A: A_ADV ; !liäggusávt
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^RVSH%>  ATTR_R ; ! liägus 
+A:^RVSH%> A_LASJ ; !  



LEXICON SENES !!≈ **@CODE@** not fitting in X_PELES because of CSH attr. seŋes
+A+Attr:^WG^RVSH  K ; ! seŋes 
+A+Cmp/Attr:^WG^RVSH%> ATTR_R ;
+A+Sg+Nom:^WG^RVSH K ; !peles
+A+Sg+Gen: K ;   !
+A+Sg+Acc: K ;      
+A+Sg+Ill:%>ân K ; 
+A+Sg+Loc:%>ist K ;
+A+Sg+Com:%>áin K ;
+A+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá K ;  
+A+Ess:^WG^RVSH%>in K ; 
+A+Par:^WG^RVSH%>id K ; 
+A: X_eh_PL ;
+A:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:^WG%>u COMPo ; 
+A+Err/Orth:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:^WG%>u MOS ;
+A+Err/Orth:%>u MOS ;
+A:^WG^RVSH%> A_VUOTA ;
+A: A_ADV ; !ollásávt
+A:^WG%> A_LASJ ; !  




LEXICON KEPPIS !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_LITTER, attr. keppâ
+A+Attr:â K ;    ! keppâ
+A+Attr+Use/NG:is%>is K ;    ! keppisis
+A:is X_LITTER ;
+A:is%>u COMPo ; 
+A:is%>u MOS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:â%>  ATTR_R ;
+A:is%> A_VUOTA ;
+A:is A_ADV ;
+A: A_LASJ ; !  

LEXICON PASTEL !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_LITTER, attr. pastelis; adj is PASTEL
+A+Attr:%>is  K ; !
+A: X_LITTER ;
+A:%>u COMPo ; 
+A:%>u MOS ;
+A:%> A_VUOTA ;
+A+Attr+Err/Orth:%>is%>  A_VUOTA ; ! corp: pehtilisvuođâ
+A: A_ADV ; !njyebžilávt
+A+Cmp/Attr:%>is ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/SgNom: R ;
+A:^FCD%> A_LASJ ; !  

LEXICON FISKAD !!≈ **@CODE@** directing to X_LITTER, attr. fiskis (fikâdis)
+A+Attr:is^CSH K ; ! fiskis sahis
+A+Attr+Err/Orth:âd%>is K ;
+A:âd X_LITTER ;
+A:âd%>u COMPo ; 
+A:âd%>u MOS ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:i^CSH%>s ATTR_R ;
+A+Cmp/Attr:âd%>is ATTR_R ;
+A+Attr+Err/Orth:is^CSH%> A_VUOTA ; ! corp: mučisvuođâ lusisvuođâ joskisvuođâ
+A:âd%> A_VUOTA ;
+A:âd A_ADV ; !muččâdávt joskâdávt
+A+Attr:i^WG%>s A_LAGAN ; !čapisláván
+A:is^CSH%> A_LASJ ; !  
